California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(i) Commencing July 1, 2012, the department shall not admit any person to a developmental center pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 106.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6000.5.

Pursuant to Section 6000, the medical director of a state hospital for the developmentally disabled may receive in such hospital, as a boarder and patient, any developmentally disabled person as defined in Section 4512 who has been referred in accordance with Sections 4652, 4653, and 4803.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.

Admissions to the Langley Porter Neuropsychiatric Institute or to the Neuropsychiatric Institute, U.C.L.A. Medical Center, may be on a voluntary basis after approval by the medical superintendent of the clinic or institute, as the case may be.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

(a) The person in charge of a private institution, hospital, or clinic that is conducted for, or includes a department or unit conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who have mental health disorders may receive therein as a voluntary patient a person with a mental health disorder who is a suitable person for care and treatment in the institution, hospital, or clinic who voluntarily makes a written application to the person in charge for admission into the institution, hospital, or clinic and who is, at the time of making the application, mentally competent to make the application. A conservatee, with a conservator of the person, or person and estate, appointed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5, with the right as specified by court order under
 Section 5358 to place his conservatee, may be admitted upon written application by his or her conservator.

(b) After the admission of a voluntary patient to a private institution, hospital, or clinic, the person in charge shall forward to the office of the State Department of State Hospitals a record of the voluntary patient showing all information required by rule by the department.

(c) A voluntary adult patient may leave the hospital, clinic, or institution at any time by giving notice of his or her desire to leave to a member of the hospital staff and completing normal hospitalization departure procedures. A conservatee may leave in a like manner if notice is given by his or her conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 107.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.10.

A facility licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, to provide inpatient psychiatric treatment, excluding state hospitals and county hospitals, shall establish admission procedures for minors who meet the following criteria:

(a) The minor is 14 years of age or older, and is under 18 years of age.

(b) The minor is not legally emancipated.

(c) The minor is not detained under Sections 5585.50 and 5585.53.

(d) The minor is not voluntarily committed pursuant to Section 6552.

(e) The minor has not been declared a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 or a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602.

(f) The minor’s admitting diagnosis or condition is either of the following:

(1) A mental health disorder only. Although resistance to treatment may be a product of a mental health disorder, the resistance shall not, in itself, imply the presence of a mental health disorder or constitute evidence that the minor meets the admission criteria. A minor shall not be considered to have a mental health disorder solely for exhibiting behaviors specified under Sections 601 and 602.

(2) A mental health disorder and a substance abuse disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 108.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.15.

(a) Prior to accepting the written authorization for treatment, the facility shall assure that a representative of the facility has given a full explanation of the treatment philosophy of the facility, including, where applicable, the use of seclusion and restraint, the use of medication, and the degree of involvement of family members in the minor’s treatment to the parent, guardian or other person entitled to the minor’s custody. This explanation shall be given orally and in writing, and shall be documented in the minor’s treatment record upon completion.

(b) As part of the admission process, the professional person responsible for the minor’s admission shall affirm in writing that the minor meets the admission
 criteria as specified above.

(c) Upon admission, a facility specified in Section 6002.10 shall do all of the following:

(1) Inform the minor in writing of the availability of an independent clinical review of his or her further inpatient treatment. The notice shall be witnessed and signed by an appropriate representative of the facility.

(2) Within one working day, notify the patients’ rights advocate, as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5540) of Chapter 5.2, regarding the admission of the minor.

(3) Provide all minors with a booklet promulgated by the State Department of Health
 Care Services outlining the specific rights of minors in mental health facilities. The booklet shall include the phone number of the local advocate and the hours that he or she may be reached.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 212.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.20.

(a) If the minor requests an independent clinical review of his or her continued inpatient treatment, the patients’ rights advocate shall be notified of the request, as soon as practical, but no later than one working day. The role of the advocate shall be to provide information and assistance to the minor relating to the minor’s right to obtain an independent clinical review to determine the appropriateness of placement within the facility. The advocate shall conduct his or her activities in a manner least disruptive to patient care in the facility. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, or expand, rights and responsibilities the advocate has pursuant to other provisions of law.

(b) An independent review may be requested up to 10 days after admission. At any time the minor may rescind his or her request for a review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1375, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.25.

The independent clinical review shall be conducted by a licensed psychiatrist with training and experience in treating psychiatric adolescent patients, who is a neutral party to the review, having no direct financial relationship with the treating clinician, nor a personal or financial relationship with the patient, or his or her parents or guardian. Nothing in this section shall prevent a psychiatrist affiliated with a health maintenance organization, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1373.10 of the Health and Safety Code, from providing the independent clinical review where the admitting, treating, and reviewing psychiatrists are affiliated with a health maintenance organization that predominantly serves members of a prepaid health care service plan. The
 independent clinical reviewer shall be assigned, on a rotating basis, from a list prepared by the facility, and submitted to the county behavioral health director prior to March 1, 1990, and annually thereafter, or more frequently when necessary. The county behavioral health director shall, on an annual basis, or at the request of the facility, review the facility’s list of independent clinical reviewers. The county behavioral health director shall approve or disapprove the list of reviewers within 30 days of submission. If there is no response from the county behavioral health director, the facility’s list shall be deemed approved. If the county behavioral health director disapproves one or more of the persons on the list of reviewers, the county behavioral health director shall notify the facility in writing of the reasons for the disapproval. The county behavioral health director, in consultation with the facility, may develop a list of one or more additional reviewers within 30 days. The final list shall
 be mutually agreeable to the county behavioral health director and the facility. Sections 6002.10 to 6002.40, inclusive, shall not be construed to prohibit the treatment of minors prior to the existence of an approved list of independent clinical reviewers. The independent clinical reviewer may be an active member of the medical staff of the facility who has no direct financial relationship, including, but not limited to, an employment or other contract arrangement with the facility except for compensation received for the service of providing clinical reviews.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 47.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.30.

(a) All reasonably available clinical information which is relevant to establishing whether the minor meets the admission criteria pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 6002.35 shall be considered by the psychiatrist conducting the review. In considering the information presented, the psychiatrist conducting the review shall privately interview the minor, and shall consult the treating clinician to review alternative treatment options which may be suitable for the minor’s mental disorder.

(b) If the minor has received medication while an inpatient, the person conducting the review shall be informed of that fact and of the probable effects of the medication. The person presenting the clinical information in favor of inpatient treatment shall also inform the psychiatrist conducting the review of the proposed treatment plan for the minor, and, if known, whether the minor has had any previous independent clinical review at any facility, and the results of that service.

(c) The standard of review shall be whether the minor continues to have a mental disorder, whether further inpatient treatment is reasonably likely to be beneficial to the minor’s mental disorder, or whether the placement in the facility represents the least restrictive, most appropriate available setting, within the constraints of reasonably available services, facilities, resources, and financial support, in which to treat the minor.

(d) The review shall take place within five days of the request.

(e) At the review, the minor shall have the right to be present, to be assisted by the advocate, and to question persons recommending inpatient treatment. If the minor is unwilling to attend, the review shall be held in his or her absence with the advocate representing the minor.

(f) The location of the independent clinical review shall be compatible with, and least disruptive of, the treatment being provided to the minor. Independent clinical reviews shall be conducted at the facility where the minor is treated. The review shall be situated in a location which ensures privacy.

(g) The independent clinical review shall be held in an informal setting so as to minimize the anxiety of both parents and minors and promote cooperation and communication among all interested parties. All parties shall make a reasonable effort to speak in terms the minor can understand and shall explain any terminology with which he or she may not be familiar.

(h) The review may be closed to anyone other than the minor, his or her parents or legal guardian, a representative of the facility, the minor’s advocate, the psychiatrist conducting the review and the person presenting information in favor of, or opposition to, the inpatient treatment. The person conducting the review shall have discretion to limit the number of participants and shall keep participants to the minimum time necessary to relate the needed information.

(i) No party shall have legal representation in the review process.

(j) If any of the parties to the independent clinical review do not comprehend the language used at the independent clinical review, it shall be the responsibility of the psychiatrist conducting the independent clinical review to retain an interpreter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1375, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.35.

(a) It shall be the responsibility of the psychiatrist conducting the independent clinical review to keep a record of the proceeding.

(b) After considering all the clinical information, the psychiatrist conducting the review shall render a binding decision. If he or she determines that further inpatient treatment is reasonably likely to be beneficial to the minor’s disorder and placement in the facility represents the least restrictive, most appropriate available setting in which to treat the minor, the minor’s inpatient treatment shall be authorized.

(c) If the psychiatrist conducting the review determines that the admission criteria have been met, this determination shall terminate when the minor is discharged from the facility.

(d) If the psychiatrist conducting the clinical review determines that further inpatient treatment in the facility is not reasonably likely to be beneficial to the minor’s mental disorder or does not represent the least restrictive, most appropriate available setting in which to treat the minor, the minor shall be released from the facility to a custodial parent or guardian on the same day the determination was made. Except as provided in Section 43.92 of the Civil Code, upon the minor’s release, neither the attending psychiatrist, any licensed health professional providing treatment to the minor in the facility, the psychiatrist who releases the minor pursuant to this section, nor the facility in which the minor was admitted or treated shall be civilly or criminally liable for any conduct of the released minor, a parent, legal guardian, or other persons entitled to custody of the minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1375, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.40.

(a) For any insurance contracts entered into after January 1, 1990, where any private insurer, certified medical plan, or private health service plan is liable to pay or reimburse a professional provider or institutional provider for the costs of medically necessary mental health services provided to the patient, the costs of the clinical review required by Sections 6002.10 to 6002.40, inclusive, including, but not limited to, the costs of the interpreter, if any, and the costs of the patients’ rights advocate, shall be borne by the insurer, certified medical plan, or the health service plan. Payments to providers for the costs of the independent clinical review shall be made promptly.

For Medi-Cal eligible patients placed in these private
 facilities, the costs of the clinical review required by Sections 6002.10 to 6002.40, inclusive, including the costs of the patients rights advocate, shall be borne by the county.

(b) The Legislature intends that Sections 6002.10 to 6002.40, inclusive, affect only the rights of minors confined in private mental health facilities on the consent of their parents or guardians, where the costs of treatment are paid or reimbursed by a private insurer or private health service plan.

(c) Mental health facilities shall summarize on an annual basis, information including, but not limited to, the number of minors admitted by diagnosis, length of stay, and source of payment, the number of requests for an independent clinical review by diagnosis, source of payment, and outcome of the independent clinical review and submit this information to the State Department of
 Health
 Care Services. The State Department of Public Health shall monitor compliance of this section during an inspection of the facility pursuant to Sections 1278 and 1279 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 213.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

As used in this article, “county psychiatric hospital” means the hospital, ward, or facility provided by the county pursuant to the provisions of Section 7100.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.1.

As used in this article, county psychiatric health facility means a 24-hour acute care facility provided by the county pursuant to the provisions in Sections 5404 and 7100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 245, Sec. 3.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.2.

Wherever in this article the term “county psychiatric hospital” appears, such term shall be interchangeable with the term “psychiatric health facility.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1234.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

The superintendent or person in charge of the county psychiatric hospital may receive, care for, or treat in the hospital any person who voluntarily makes a written application to the superintendent or person in charge thereof for admission into the hospital for care, treatment, or observation, and who is a suitable person for care, treatment, or observation, and who in the case of an adult person is in such condition of mind, at the time of making application for admission, as to render him competent to make such application. In the case of a minor person, the application shall be made by his parents, or by the parent, guardian, or other person entitled to his custody. A conservatee, with a conservator of the person, or person and estate, appointed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5, with the right as specified by court order under Section 5358 to place his conservatee, may be admitted upon written application by his conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

A voluntary adult patient may leave the hospital or institution at any time by giving notice of his desire to leave to any member of the hospital staff and completing normal hospitalization departure procedures. A conservatee may leave in a like manner if notice is given by his conservator.

A minor person who is a voluntary patient may leave the hospital or institution after completing normal hospitalization departure procedures after notice is given to the superintendent or person in charge by the parents, or the parent, guardian, or other person entitled to the custody of the minor, of their desire to remove him from the hospital.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

A person admitted as a voluntary patient to a state hospital, a private mental institution, or a county psychiatric hospital shall have the following rights in addition to the right to leave such hospital as specified in this chapter:

(a) He shall receive such care and treatment as his condition requires for the full period that he is a patient;

(b) He shall have the full patient rights specified in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

(a) Any person detained pursuant to this section shall be evaluated by the facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 5150 as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. The evaluation shall be made at the request of the person in charge of the private institution in which the person is detained or by one of the physicians who signed the certificate. If in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility or his or her designee, the evaluation of the person can be made by the professional person or his or her designee at the private institution in which the person is detained, the person shall not be required to be evaluated at the evaluation and treatment facility, but
 shall be evaluated at the private institution to determine if the person is a danger to others, himself or herself, or gravely disabled as a result of mental disorder.

(b) Any person evaluated under this section shall be released from the private institution immediately upon completion of the evaluation if in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, or his or her designee, the person evaluated is not a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled as a result of mental disorder, unless the person agrees voluntarily to remain in the private institution.

(c) If in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee, the person evaluated requires intensive treatment or recommendation for conservatorship, the professional person or his or her designee shall proceed under Article 4
 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2, or under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), of Part 1 of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 52.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

For the purposes of this part, a person who is a conservatee with a conservator of the person or of the person and estate appointed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 with the right as specified by court order under Section 5358 to place his conservatee in a hospital of the United States government, may be admitted to such a hospital upon written application made by his conservator. A conservatee so admitted to such a hospital may leave the hospital at any time after his conservator gives notice to a member of the hospital staff that the conservatee is leaving and normal hospitalization departure procedures are completed by the conservator or by the conservator and conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. JUDICIAL COMMITMENTS [6250. - 6825.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions, Construction and Standard Forms [6250. - 6254.]

6250.

(a) As used in this part, “a person subject to judicial commitment” means a person who may be judicially committed under this part as a mentally disordered sex offender pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6331), a sexually violent predator pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600), or a person with intellectual disabilities pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2.

(b) Nothing in this part shall be held to change or interfere with the provisions of the Penal Code and other laws relating to persons with mental health disorders who are charged with a crime or to persons who are found to be not guilty by reason of insanity.

(c) This part shall be liberally
 construed so that, as far as possible and consistent with the rights of persons subject to commitment, those persons shall be treated, not as criminals, but as sick persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 109.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6251.

Wherever, on the basis of a petition, provision is made in this code for issuing and delivering an order for examination and detention directing that a person be apprehended and taken before a judge of a superior court for a hearing and examination on an allegation of being a person subject to judicial commitment, the petition shall be in substantially the following form: In the Superior Court of the State of California
 For the County of____The PeopleFor the Best Interest and Protection of⎫
⎪
⎪

as a ⎪and Concerning and ⎬
⎪Petition⎪Respondents⎪
⎭_______, residing at ______ (tel. _______), being duly sworn deposes and says: That there is now in the county in the City or Town of __________a person named ______, who resides at ______, and who is believed to be a ______. That the person is ____ years of age; that __ the person is ____ (sex) and that __ the person is ____ (single, married, widowed, or divorced); and that ____ occupation is ____.That the facts because of which petitioner believes that the person is a ____ are as follows: That __ the person, at _______ in the county, on the____ day of ____, 20__,That petitioner’s interest in and case is That petitioner believes that said person is ____ as defined in Section ____.That the persons responsible
 for the care, support, and maintenance of the ____, and their relationship to the person are, so far as known to the petitioner, as follows:(Give names, addresses, and relationship of persons named as respondents)Wherefore, petitioner prays that examination be made to determine the state of the mental health of ____, alleged to be ____, and that such measures be taken for the best interest and protection of said ____, in respect to the person’s supervision, care and treatment, as may be necessary and provided by law.Petitioner Subscribed and sworn to before me this ____ day of ______, 20__.________________________________, Clerk of the Court 
By _____________________________________________ Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 619.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6252.

Wherever provision is made in this code for a judge of a superior court to issue and deliver an order for examination or detention directing that a person be apprehended and taken before a judge of a superior court for a hearing and examination on an allegation of being a person subject to judicial commitment, the order for examination or detention shall be in substantially the following form:The PeopleFor the Best Interest and Protection of⎫
⎪
⎪

Order
for
Exammination
or
Dententionas a ⎪and
 Concerning and ⎬
⎪⎪Respondents⎪
⎭The People of the State of California (peace officer)The petition for ________ having been presented this day to me, a Judge of the Superior Court in and for the County of
 ________, State of California, from which it appears that there is now in this county, at ________, a person by the name of ________, who is a ________.And it satisfactorily appears to me that said person is sufficiently ________ that examination should be made and hearing held, if demanded, to determine the supervision, treatment, care or restraint, if any, necessary for his best interest and protection, and the protection of the people.I do hereby appoint ________ and ________ as medical examiners to make a personal examination of ________, the person alleged to be ________, and to report thereon to the court, pursuant to Section ________ of the Welfare and Institutions Code.* Now, therefore, you are commanded to notify said ________, to submit to an examination ________ on or before the ________ day of ________, that thereafter he may be taken
 before a judge of the superior court in this county for examination and hearing to determine the measures to be taken for the best interest and protection of said ________, as a ________, as provided by law.* And it affirmatively appearing to me that said person is sufficiently ________ that he is likely to injure himself or others if not immediately hospitalized or detained, you are therefore commanded to forthwith detain said ________, or cause him to be detained for examination and hearing, pending the further order of the judge, at ________, and there becared for in a humane manner as a ________ and provided with any medical treatment deemed necessary to his physical well-being.* And it satisfactorily appearing to me that said person has failed or has refused to appear for examination when notified by order of this court, you are therefore commanded to forthwith detain said ________ or cause him to
 be detained for examination and hearing, pending the further order of the judge, at ________, and there be cared for in a humane manner as a ________.I hereby direct that a copy of this order, together with a copy of the said petition be delivered to said person and his representative, if any, at the time of his notification; and I further direct that this order may be served at any hour of the night.Witness my hand, this ________ day of ________, 19__.Judge of the Superior Court* Strike out when not applicable.Return of
 OrderI hereby certify that I received the above order for examination or detention, and on the ________ day of ________, 19__, served it by notifying and delivering to said ________ personally, and to his representatives, if any, to wit, ________, a copy of the order and of the petition, *or by apprehending said person and causing h__ to be detained for examination and hearing and for humane care as an alleged ________ at ________; until further ordered and directed by the judge.* I hereby certify that prior to the service of the above order for detention and the apprehension of ________ I served notice on the person and his representative, if any, as required under Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.Dated
 __________, 19__.Signature of officer* Strike out when not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

6253.

Wherever provision is made in this code for court-appointed medical examiners to make and sign a certificate showing the facts of an examination in the case of a person alleged to be subject to judicial commitment, the certificate shall be in substantially the following form:
 In the Superior Court of the State of California
 for the County of ________

In the Superior Court of the State of California
 for the County of ________The PeopleFor the Best Interest and Protection of,⎫
⎪
⎪
⎪

Certificate 
of Medical 
Examinersas a and⎬⎪Concerning ,⎪and ,⎪Respondents⎪
⎭We, Dr.
 ________ and Dr. ________, medical examiners in the County of ________, duly appointed and certified as such, do hereby certify under our hands that we have examined ________, alleged to be a ________, and have attended before a judge of said court at the hearing on the petition concerning said person, and have heard the testimony of all witnesses, and, as a result of the examination, have testified under oath before the court to the following facts concerning the alleged ____________:Name Address Age Sex Occupation Marital status (Single,
 married, widowed, divorced) Religious belief Pertinent case history General physical condition Present mental status Laboratory reports (if any) Tentative diagnosis of mental health Recommendation for disposition or supervision, treatment and care Reason for the recommendation Date ________________Medical ExaminerMedical Examiner

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

6254.

Wherever provision is made in this code for an order of commitment by a superior court, the order of commitment shall be in substantially the following form:In the Superior Court of the State of California
 For the County of ____The PeopleFor the Best Interest and Protection of⎫
⎪
⎪

Order for Care,
Hospitalization,
or Commitmentas a ,⎪⎪and Concerning and ⎬
⎪, Respondents⎪⎭ The petition dated ________, alleging that ________, having been presented to this court on the ________ day of ________, 20__, and an order of detention issued thereon by a judge of the superior court of this county, and a return of the said order:And it further appearing that the provisions of Sections 6250 to 6254, inclusive, of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code have been complied with;And it further appearing that Dr. ________ and Dr. ________, two regularly appointed and qualified medical examiners of this county, have made a personal examination of the alleged ________, and have made and signed the certificate of the medical examiners, which certificate is attached hereto and made a part hereof;Now therefore, after examination and certificate made as aforesaid, the court is satisfied and believes that ________ is a ________ and is so ________.It is ordered, adjudged, and decreed:That ________ is a ________ and that _he* (a) Be cared for and detained in ________, a county psychiatric hospital, a community mental health service, or a licensed hospital for the care
 of persons with mental health disorders until the further order of the court, or* (b) Be cared for at ________, until the further order of the court, or * (c) Be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals for placement in a state hospital, or * (d) Be committed to a facility of the Department of Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States, to wit: ________ at ________.It is further ordered and directed that ________ of this county, take, convey, and deliver ________ to the proper authorities of the hospital or establishment designated herein to be cared for as provided by law.Dated this
 ________ day of ________, 20__.Judge of the Superior Court* Strike out when not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 110.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Commitment Classification [6331. - 6609.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Mentally Disordered Sex Offenders (Repealed) [6331. - 6332.]

6331.

This article shall become inoperative the day after the election at which the electors adopt this section, except that the article shall continue to apply in all respects to those already committed under its provisions.

The provisions of this section shall not be amended by the Legislature except by statute passed in each house by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, or by a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the electors.

(History: Added June 8, 1982, by initiative Proposition 8, Sec. 9.   Note: This section relates to the subject matter of former Article 1 (Sections 6300 to 6330), which was repealed on Jan. 1, 1982, by Stats. 1981, Ch. 928.)
-------------------------------------------

6332.

For a person committed as a mentally disordered sex offender, whose term of commitment has been extended pursuant to former Section 6316.2, and who is placed on outpatient status pursuant to Section 1604 of the Penal Code, time spent on outpatient status, except when placed in a locked facility at the direction of the outpatient supervisor, shall not count as actual custody and shall not be counted toward the person’s maximum term of commitment or toward the person’s term of extended commitment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 3.   Effective November 30, 1994.   Note: The section relates to the subject matter of former Article 1 (Sections 6300 to 6330), which was repealed on Jan. 1, 1982, by Stats. 1981, Ch. 928.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Persons with Intellectual Disabilities [6500. - 6513.]

6500.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Dangerousness to self or others” shall include, but not be limited to, a finding of incompetence to stand trial pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code when the defendant has been charged with murder, mayhem, aggravated mayhem, a violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5 of the Penal Code in which the victim suffers intentionally inflicted great bodily injury, robbery perpetrated by torture or by a person armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon or in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, carjacking perpetrated by torture or by a person armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon or in which the victim suffers great
 bodily injury, a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 451 of the Penal Code, a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262 or paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 of the Penal Code, a violation of Section 288 of the Penal Code, any of the following acts when committed by force, violence, duress, menace, fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person: a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262 of the Penal Code, a violation of Section 264.1, 286, or 287 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code, or a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 289 of the Penal Code; a violation of Section 459 of the Penal Code in the first degree, assault with intent to commit murder, a violation of Section 220 of the Penal Code in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, a violation of Section 18725, 18740, 18745, 18750, or 18755 of the Penal Code, or if the defendant has been charged with a felony
 involving death, great bodily injury, or an act that poses a serious threat of bodily harm to another person.

(2) “Developmental disability” shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512.

(b) (1) A person with a developmental disability may be committed to the State Department of Developmental Services for residential placement other than in a developmental center or state-operated community facility, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 6509, if the person is found to be a danger to self or others.

(A) An order of commitment made pursuant to this paragraph shall expire automatically one year after the order of commitment is made.

(B) This paragraph does not prohibit any party enumerated in Section
 6502 from filing subsequent petitions for additional periods of commitment. If subsequent petitions are filed, the procedures followed shall be the same as with the initial petition for commitment.

(2) A person with a developmental disability shall not be committed to the State Department of Developmental Services for placement in a developmental center or state-operated community facility pursuant to this article unless the person meets the criteria for admission to a developmental center or state-operated community facility pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), (4), (5), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505 and is dangerous to self or others, or as a result of an acute crisis, or the person currently is a resident of a state developmental center or state-operated community facility pursuant to an order of commitment made pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 2012, and is being recommitted pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subdivision.

(3) If the person with a developmental disability is in the care or treatment of a state hospital, developmental center, or other facility at the time a petition for commitment is filed pursuant to this article, proof of a recent overt act while in the care and treatment of a state hospital, developmental center, or other facility is not required in order to find that the person is a danger to self or others.

(4) If subsequent petitions are filed with respect to a resident of a developmental center or a state-operated community facility committed prior to July 1, 2012, the procedures followed and criteria for recommitment shall be the same as with the initial petition for commitment.

(5) In any proceedings conducted under the authority of this article, the person alleged to have a developmental disability shall be